Illinois, session 104th, HB2610.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Free 5Speech Protection Act.  6    Section 5. Free speech. Except as otherwise provided in 7Section 10 of this Act, a person who has received permission to 8place a sign or display on State-supported property has the 9right to exercise freedom of speech. There shall be no prior 10restraint of material prepared for such a sign or display 11except insofar as it violates Section 10 of this Act. State 12officials charged with the care and custody of the 13State-supported property in question shall have the burden of 14showing justification without undue delay prior to a 15limitation of expression under this Act. 16    Section 10. Exceptions. This Act does not authorize or 17protect expression by a person described in Section 5 through 18a sign or display that:19        (1) is libelous, slanderous, or obscene;20        (2) constitutes an unwarranted invasion of privacy;21        (3) violates federal or State law;22        (4) a reasonable person would understand as intended   HB2610- 2 -LRB104 10360 HLH 20435 b1    to denigrate or hold up to ridicule the beliefs of a 2    religion, including, but not limited to, the display of a 3    recognized or altered version of a symbol of a religion in 4    such a manner; or5        (5) incites others to commit an unlawful act, or to 6    materially and substantially disrupt the orderly operation 7    of the State-supported property in question. 8    Section 15. Liability. No expression made by a person 9described in Section 5 through a sign or display in the 10exercise of freedom of speech shall be deemed to be an 11expression of the public policy of the State of Illinois, and 12the State of Illinois, including, but not limited to, any 13State agency, official, or employee shall not be held liable 14in any civil or criminal action for any expression made by a 15person described in Section 5 through a sign or display. 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 17becoming law.